tests/kik.twoc
Alphabet
  %[%-sg%]:0 %[%-pl%]:0
  %[%+sg%]:0 %[%+pl%]:0

%[%-foc%]:0
%[%+foc%]:0
%[%-seq%]:0
%[%+seq%]:0

%[%-rempast%]:0
%[%-nearpast%]:0
%[%-currpast%]:0
%[%-pres%]:0
%[%-currfut%]:0
%[%-remfut%]:0

%[%-inf%]:0
%[%+inf%]:0

%[%+rempast%]:0
%[%+nearpast%]:0
%[%+currpast%]:0
%[%+pres%]:0
%[%+currfut%]:0
%[%+remfut%]:0

%[%-p1%]:0
%[%-p2%]:0
%[%+p1%]:0
%[%+p2%]:0

%[%-cl1%]:0 ! Noun class 1
%[%-cl3%]:0 ! Noun class 3
%[%-cl5%]:0 ! Noun class 6
%[%-cl7%]:0 ! Noun class 7
%[%-cl9p6%]:0   ! Noun class 9p6
%[%-cl9p1%0%]:0  ! Noun class 9p1%0
%[%-cl11p6%]:0  ! Noun class 11p6
%[%-cl11p1%0%]:0 ! Noun class 11p1%0
%[%-cl12p6%]:0 ! Noun class 12p6
%[%-cl12p13%]:0 ! Noun class 12p13
%[%-cl14%]:0    ! Noun class 14
%[%-cl15%]:0    ! Noun class 15

%[%+cl1%]:0 ! Noun class 1
%[%+cl3%]:0 ! Noun class 3
%[%+cl5%]:0 ! Noun class 6
%[%+cl7%]:0 ! Noun class 7
%[%+cl9p6%]:0   ! Noun class 9p6
%[%+cl9p1%0%]:0  ! Noun class 9p1%0
%[%+cl11p6%]:0  ! Noun class 11p6
%[%+cl11p1%0%]:0 ! Noun class 11p1%0
%[%+cl12p6%]:0 ! Noun class 12p6
%[%+cl12p13%]:0 ! Noun class 12p13
%[%+cl14%]:0    ! Noun class 14
%[%+cl15%]:0    ! Noun class 15
%[%+cl16%]:0
%[%-cl16%]:0
%[%+cl17%]:0
%[%-cl17%]:0

%[%-dim%]:0
%[%+dim%]:0

%[%-refl%]:0
%[%+refl%]:0
%[%-imp%]:0
%[%+imp%]:0
%[%-neg%]:0
%[%+neg%]:0

%[%-hab%]:0
%[%-perf%]:0
%[%-noasp%]:0
%[%-compl%]:0
%[%-proc%]:0
%[%-fvA%]:0
%[%-fvE%]:0

%[%+hab%]:0
%[%+perf%]:0
%[%+noasp%]:0
%[%+compl%]:0
%[%+proc%]:0
%[%+fvA%]:0
%[%+fvE%]:0
!%[%+fvĨ%]:0
!%[%-fvĨ%]:0
;

Rules

"Match number prefixes and person"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in ( %[%-sg%]  )
         Ty in ( %[%+sg%] )
   matched ;

"Match number prefixes and person 2"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in ( %[%-pl%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+pl%] )
   matched ;


"Match number prefixes and person 2a"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in ( %[%-p2%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+p2%] )
   matched ;

"Match number prefixes and person 2b"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in ( %[%-p1%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+p1%] )
   matched ;

"Match number prefixes and person s2a"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in ( %[%-p2%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+p2%] )
   matched ;

"Match number prefixes and person s2b"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in ( %[%-p1%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+p1%] )
   matched ;

"Match tense and focus, part 1a"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in ( %[%-currpast%] %[%-pres%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+currpast%] %[%+pres%] )
   matched ;

"Match tense and focus, part 1b"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in ( %[%-currfut%] %[%-remfut%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+currfut%] %[%+remfut%] )
   matched ;

"Match tense and focus, part 2a"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in ( %[%-foc%] %[%-seq%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+foc%] %[%+seq%] )
   matched ;

 "Match tense and focus, part 2a.5"
 Ty:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Tx:0 (:*) _ ;
   where Tx in ( %[%-foc%] %[%-seq%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+foc%] %[%+seq%] )
   matched ;

"Match tense and focus, part 2b"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except!
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in ( %[%-rempast%] %[%-nearpast%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+rempast%] %[%+nearpast%] )
   matched ;


!"Match noun class and person, part s1a"
!Tx:0 /<= _ ;
!   except
!       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
!   where Tx in  ( %[%-scl3%] )
!         Ty in ( %[%+scl3%] )
!   matched ;


!"Match noun class and person, part s1a2"
!Tx:0 /<= _ ;
!   except
!       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
!   where Tx in  ( %[%-scl1%] )
!         Ty in ( %[%+scl1%] )
!   matched ;


!"Match noun class and person, part s2a"
!Tx:0 /<= _ ;
!   except
!       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
!   where Tx in  ( %[%-scl9p1%0%] )
!         Ty in (%[%+scl9p1%0%] )
!   matched ;

!"Match noun class and person, part s2a2"
!Tx:0 /<= _ ;
!   except
!       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
!   where Tx in  (  %[%-scl9p6%] )
!         Ty in ( %[%+scl9p6%] )
!   matched ;


!"Match noun class and person, part s3a"
!Tx:0 /<= _ ;
!   except
!       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
!   where Tx in  ( %[%-scl12p13%] )
!         Ty in ( %[%+scl12p13%] )
!   matched ;

!"Match noun class and person, part s3a2"
!Tx:0 /<= _ ;
!   except
!       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
!   where Tx in  ( %[%-cl12p6%] )
!         Ty in ( %[%+cl12p6%] )
!   matched ;


!"Match noun class and person, part s1b"
!Tx:0 /<= _ ;
!   except
!       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
!   where Tx in  ( %[%-scl7%] )
!         Ty in ( %[%+scl7%] )
!   matched ;

!"Match noun class and person, part s1b2"
!Tx:0 /<= _ ;
!   except
!       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
!   where Tx in  ( %[%-scl5%] )
!         Ty in ( %[%+scl5%] )
!   matched ;


!"Match noun class and person, part s2b"
!Tx:0 /<= _ ;
!   except
!       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
!   where Tx in  ( %[%-scl11p6%] )
!         Ty in ( %[%+scl11p6%] )
!   matched ;

!"Match noun class and person, part s2b2"
!Tx:0 /<= _ ;

!   except
!       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
!   where Tx in  ( %[%-scl11p1%0%] )
!         Ty in ( %[%+scl11p1%0%] )
!   matched ;


!"Match noun class and person, part s3b"
!Tx:0 /<= _ ;
!   except
!       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
!   where Tx in  ( %[%-scl14%] )
!         Ty in ( %[%+scl14%] )
!   matched ;


!"Match noun class and person, part s3b2"
!Tx:0 /<= _ ;
!   except
!       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
!   where Tx in  (%[%-scl15%] )
!         Ty in (%[%+scl15%] )
!   matched ;


"Match noun class and person, parts1a"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in  ( %[%-scl3%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+scl3%] )
   matched ;


"Match noun class and person, part 1a2"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in  ( %[%-cl1%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+cl1%] )
   matched ;


"Match noun class and person, part 2a"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in  ( %[%-cl9p1%0%] )
         Ty in (%[%+cl9p1%0%] )
   matched ;

"Match noun class and person, part 2a2"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in  (  %[%-cl9p6%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+cl9p6%] )
   matched ;


"Match noun class and person, part 3a"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in  ( %[%-cl12p13%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+cl12p13%] )
   matched ;

"Match noun class and person, part 3a2"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in  ( %[%-cl12p6%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+cl12p6%] )
   matched ;


"Match noun class and person, part 1b"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in  ( %[%-cl7%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+cl7%] )
   matched ;

"Match noun class and person, part 1b2"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in  ( %[%-cl5%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+cl5%] )
   matched ;


"Match noun class and person, part 2b"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in  ( %[%-cl11p6%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+cl11p6%] )
   matched ;

"Match noun class and person, part 2b2"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in  ( %[%-cl11p1%0%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+cl11p1%0%] )
   matched ;


"Match noun class and person, part 3b"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in  ( %[%-cl14%])
         Ty in ( %[%+cl14%] )
   matched ;


"Match noun class and person, part 3b2"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in  (%[%-cl15%] )
         Ty in (%[%+cl15%] )
   matched ;

"Match noun class and person, part 4"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in  (%[%-cl16%]  %[%-cl17%] )
         Ty in (%[%+cl16%] %[%+cl17%] )
   matched ;

"Match no object"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in  (%[%-noobj%] )
         Ty in (%[%+noobj%] )
   matched ;


"Match reflexive, imperative, and negative part 1"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in  ( %[%-refl%] %[%-imp%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+refl%] %[%+imp%] )
   matched ;

"Match reflexive, imperative, and negative part 1.5"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Ty:0 (:*) _ ;
   where Ty in  ( %[%-refl%] %[%-imp%] )
         Tx in ( %[%+refl%] %[%+imp%] )
   matched ;

"Match infinitive"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Ty:0 (:*) _ ;
   where Ty in  ( %[%-inf%] %[%-dim%] )
         Tx in ( %[%+inf%] %[%+dim%] )
   matched ;

"Match diminutive"
Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Tx:0 (:*) _ ;
   where Tx in  ( %[%-dim%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+dim%] )
   matched ;

 "Match reflexive, imperative, and negative part 2"
 Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Tx in  ( %[%-neg%] )
         Ty in ( %[%+neg%] )
   matched ;

 "Match reflexive, imperative, and negative part 2"
 Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Ty:0 (:*) _ ;
   where Tx in  ( %[%+neg%] )
         Ty in ( %[%-neg%] )
   matched ;


 "Match aspect part 1"
 Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Ty:0 (:*) _ ;
   where Tx in  ( %[%+compl%] %[%+hab%] )
         Ty in ( %[%-compl%] %[%-hab%] )
   matched ;

 "Match aspect part 2"
 Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Ty:0 (:*) _ ;
   where Tx in  ( %[%+noasp%] %[%+perf%] )
         Ty in ( %[%-noasp%] %[%-perf%] )
   matched ;

 "Match aspect part 3"
 Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Ty:0 (:*) _ ;
   where Tx in  ( %[%+proc%] )
         Ty in ( %[%-proc%] )
   matched ;

 "Coordinate final vowels"
 Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Ty:0 (:*) _ ;
   where Tx in  ( %[%+fvA%] )
         Ty in ( %[%-fvA%]  )
   ;

 "Coordinate final vowels 2"
 Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Ty:0 (:*) _ ;
   where Tx in  ( %[%+fvE%] )
         Ty in ( %[%-fvE%] )
   matched ;


 "Coordinate final vowels (reverse) "
 Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Ty in  ( %[%+fvA%] )
         Tx in ( %[%-fvA%] )
   matched ;

 "Coordinate final vowels (reverse) 2 "
 Tx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
   where Ty in  ( %[%+fvE%] )
         Tx in ( %[%-fvE%] )
   matched ;

! "Coordinate final vowels 2"
! Tx:0 /<= _ ;
!   except
!       Ty:0 (:*) _ ;
!   where Tx in  ( %[%+fvĨ%] )
!         Ty in ( %[%-fvĨ%] )
!   matched ;

! "Coordinate final vowels 2 (reverse) "
! Tx:0 /<= _ ;
!   except
!       _ (:*) Ty:0 ;
!   where Ty in  ( %[%+fvĨ%] )
!        Tx in ( %[%-fvĨ%] )
!   matched ;
